Utah statutes.
35A-1-203.   Executive director -- Jurisdiction over division and regional directors -- No jurisdiction over Workforce Appeals Board -- Authority.

(1)  The executive director has administrative jurisdiction over each division and regional workforce services area.

(2)  To effectuate greater statewide efficiency and local flexibility in the implementation of programs, the executive director shall coordinate with the directors of the divisions and the directors of the regional workforce services areas.

(3)  The executive director shall consult with the applicable consortium of counties in developing management systems, administrative processes, and jurisdictions of the regional workforce services area.  The management systems, administrative processes, and jurisdictions shall comply with Title 67, Chapter 19, Utah State Personnel Management Act.

(4)  To effectuate greater efficiency and economy in the operations of the department, the executive director may:

(a)  make changes in personnel and service functions in the divisions and regional workforce services areas under the executive director’s administrative jurisdiction; and

(b)  authorize designees to perform appropriate responsibilities.

(5) (a)  The executive director has no jurisdiction over the Workforce Appeals Board except as provided in Subsection (5)(b).

(b)  The executive director shall:

(i)  approve the budget of the Workforce Appeals Board;

(ii)  provide the necessary staff support to the Workforce Appeals Board; and

(iii)  make rules necessary for the operations of the Workforce Appeals Board and the efficiency of the adjudicative process as a whole in accordance with Section 35A-1-303.

(6)  To facilitate management of the department, the executive director may establish offices necessary to implement this title or to perform functions such as budgeting, planning, data processing, and personnel administration.

